Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB930.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "chief school administrator" in section 1301-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1301-A. Definitions.--As used in this article,"Chief school administrator" shall mean the superintendent of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 a public school district, superintendent of an area career and technical school, executive director of an intermediate unit or chief [executive officer] administrator of a charter school.* * *Section 2. The definition of "chief school administrator" in section 1301-B of the act is amended to read:Section 1301-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meaning given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chief school administrator." The superintendent of a public school district, superintendent of an area career and technical school, executive director of an intermediate unit or chief [executive officer] administrator of a charter school.* * *Section 3. Section 1302-B(i) and (j)(1)(i) of the act are amended to read:Section 1302-B. School Safety and Security Committee.* * *(i) Cooperation.--[The] In cooperation with the committee, the commission shall [cooperate with the committee to] establish an Office of School Safety and Security and shall select staff to be employed by the commission and assigned to assist the committee in carrying out its duties.(j) Executive committee.--(1) The committee shall establish an executive committee which shall meet, at a minimum, every two months to identify and review current and emerging school safety issues, including, but not limited to:(i) data on issues and incidents reported through 20250SB0930PN1047 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Safe2Say Something Program;* * *Section 4. Section 1304-B of the act is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1304-B. School safety and security assessment providers.* * *(d) Review of registered assessment providers.--Annually, the committee shall select a sample of active registered school safety and security assessment providers to submit a completed assessment for review. The committee shall ensure all registered school safety and security providers are reviewed every three years. The registered provider may be required to correct deficiencies identified in assessment materials.(e) Removal.--Registered providers may be removed from the registered provider list if the assessors are unresponsive or inactive or if the assessment materials are determined to be inconsistent with the approved assessment criteria under section 1303-B.Section 5. Section 1306-B(h)(4) of the act is amended and subsections (h) and (j) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1306-B. School Safety and Security Grant Program.* * *(h) School Safety and Security Fund.--* * *(4) The fund may only be used for the grant programs authorized under this article and no money in the fund may be transferred or diverted to any other purpose by administrative action[.], except the committee may authorize 20250SB0930PN1047 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the use of unexpended, uncommitted money in the fund to be:(i) Used for purposes of fulfilling training requirements under Articles XIII-B, XIII-C and XIII-E.(ii) (Reserved).* * *(7.1) No more than 3% of the money in the fund shall be used for administrative costs associated with carrying out the duties under this article.* * *(j) Specific purposes.--The committee shall provide grants to school entities for programs that address school mental health and safety and security, including:* * *(32) Cyber safety and security measures to prevent a breach of the security of the system as defined in section 2 of the act of December 22, 2005 (P.L.474, No.94), known as the Breach of Personal Information Notification Act.* * *Section 6. Section 1309-B(c)(2) and (d) of the act are amended, subsection (c)(5.1)(iii) is amended by adding a clause and subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1309-B. School safety and security coordinator.* * *(c) Specific duties.--The school safety and security coordinator shall:* * *(2) Coordinate training and resources for students and school entity staff in matters relating to situational awareness, trauma-informed approaches, behavioral health awareness, suicide and bullying awareness, substance abuse 20250SB0930PN1047 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 awareness and emergency procedures and training drills, including fire, natural disaster, active shooter, hostage situation [and], bomb threat and cyber safety and security events.(3.1) Coordinate school safety and security meetings with school and building leadership, at least quarterly.* * *(5.1) No later than June 30, 2025, and each June 30 thereafter, make a report to the school entity's board of directors on the school entity's current school security personnel. The following apply:* * *(iii) Each report shall include:* * *(F) Beginning June 30, 2026, and each June 30 thereafter, an attendance report of school and building personnel present at school safety and security meetings, including yearly attendance totals.* * *(d) Training required.--(1) School administrators appointed as school safety and security coordinators shall complete the seven hours of training required under section 1316-B within one year [from the time the first trainings that meet the criteria are posted by the committee] of appointment.(2) School administrators appointed as safety and security coordinators [after trainings are posted shall complete the training within one year of appointment] shall complete any additional continuing education requirements as 20250SB0930PN1047 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adopted by the committee.Section 7. Section 1310-B(a) introductory paragraph of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1310-B. School safety and security training.(a) School entity duties.--School entities, in consultation with the school safety and security coordinator, shall provide their employees with mandatory training on school safety and security subject to the following based on the needs of the school entity:* * *(a.2) Input.--Annually, the school safety and security coordinator shall meet with school employees for input on the training for the school entity under subsection (a).* * *Section 8. Section 1319-B(f) of the act is amended and subsection (d) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1319-B. Reporting and memorandum of understanding.* * *(d) Advisory committee.--A chief school administrator shall form an advisory committee composed of relevant school staff, including, but not limited to, principals, security personnel, school safety and security coordinator, emergency services personnel, school security personnel, guidance counselors and special education administrators to assist in the development of a memorandum of understanding under this section. In consultation with the advisory committee, the chief school administrator shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction over school property of the school entity. The chief school administrator 20250SB0930PN1047 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall submit a copy of the memorandum of understanding to the department by June 30, 2024, and biennially update and re-execute a memorandum of understanding with law enforcement and file the memorandum with the department on a biennial basis. The memorandum of understanding shall be signed by the chief school administrator, the chief of police of the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the relevant school property and principals of each school building of the school entity. The memorandum of understanding shall comply with the regulations promulgated under section 1306.2-B and shall also include:* * *(4) A procedure for timely coordination between the school entity's threat assessment team and the law enforcement agency, if necessary, pursuant to section 1302-E.* * *(f) Noncompliance.--If a school entity or law enforcement agency fails to comply with the provisions of this section, the school entity or law enforcement agency may not be awarded any grant administered by the committee until such time as the school entity or law enforcement agency has complied with this section. No later than September 1 of each year, the department shall provide the committee with a list of school entities that have not reported information under this section to the department.* * *Section 9. Sections 1305-C(a)(2)(i), 1313-C(a.1)(1), 1314-C(b)(1) and 1315-C(1), Article XIII-D heading and section 1301-D(3), (4), (5) and (6) of the act are amended to read:Section 1305-C. Training.(a) General rule.--A school police officer who has been 20250SB0930PN1047 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 granted powers under section 1306-C(a)(3) or (b) or has been authorized to carry a firearm must, before entering upon the duties of the office, satisfy the following:* * *(2) (i) Successfully complete [the Basic School Resource Officer Course offered by the National Association of School Resource Officers or an equivalent course of instruction approved by the commission.] training for school security personnel in accordance with the standards approved by the commission and with a provider approved in accordance with section 1315-C.* * *Section 1313-C. School resource officers.* * *(a.1) Training.--(1) Prior to entering upon the duties of the office, a school resource officer shall successfully complete [the Basic School Resource Officer Course offered by the National Association of School Resource Officers or an equivalent course of instruction approved by the commission.] training for school security personnel in accordance with the standards approved by the commission and with a provider approved in accordance with section 1315-C.* * *Section 1314-C. School security guards.* * *(b) Training.--The following shall apply:(1) Prior to entering upon the duties of the office, a school security guard shall successfully complete [the Basic School Resource Officer Course offered by the National 20250SB0930PN1047 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Association of School Resource Officers or an equivalent course of instruction approved by the commission.] training for school security personnel in accordance with the standards approved by the commission and with a provider approved in accordance with section 1315-C.* * *Section 1315-C. Duties of commission.The commission shall have the following duties under this article:(1) [In conjunction with the department and the Pennsylvania State Police, periodically reassess the training requirements for all school security personnel, including the Basic School Resource Officer Course offered by the National Association of School Resource Officers.] The following:(i) In consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police, adopt minimum standards for training of school security personnel who will provide school security services in school entities and nonpublic schools. The standards shall incorporate the subjects included in the Basic School Resource Officer Course offered by the National Association of School Resource Officers and subjects specific to Pennsylvania law. The commission may approve groups, organizations or other entities to provide training under this paragraph.(ii) The commission, in conjunction with the Pennsylvania State Police, shall periodically reassess the standards and training requirements for all school security personnel.* * *ARTICLE XIII-D20250SB0930PN1047 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SAFE2SAY SOMETHING PROGRAMSection 1301-D. Intent.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:* * *(3) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Safe2Say Something Program be a one-stop shop for students, teachers and community members to report behavior perceived to be threatening to an individual or a school entity. Reports made through the anonymous reporting system will be referred to local schools, law enforcement and/or organizations.(4) The intent of the General Assembly is for the Safe2Say Something Program to supplement, not replace, 911 services. The Safe2Say Something Program is intended to facilitate increased communication between law enforcement, school districts and organizations.(5) It is not the intent of the General Assembly that the Safe2Say Something Program be used as a disciplinary tool for school employees. However, there may be instances where information obtained through the program may be shared with and used by school officials.(6) The Safe2Say Something Program is not meant to be a tool for law enforcement. However, there may be instances where information obtained through the program may be shared with and used by law enforcement.Section 10. The definition of "program" in section 1302-D of the act is amended to read:Section 1302-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20250SB0930PN1047 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Program." The Safe2Say Something Program established under section 1303-D(a).* * *Section 11. Section 1303-D heading, (a) and (d) of the act are amended, subsection (c) is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1303-D. Safe2Say Something Program.(a) Establishment.--The Safe2Say Something Program is established within the office.* * *(c) Program requirements.--Beginning January 14, 2019, the program shall be responsible for the following:* * *(11) To develop a training program for school personnel on the program which, at a minimum, should include training on receiving, responding to and disposing of a report. The office may partner with a third party to develop the training program. The training program shall be made available to school entities at no charge to the school entity.(12) To provide technical assistance and support to the program, as needed.(13) To follow up and determine the outcome of a report made to the program, including actions taken on the report.(d) School entity.--Each school entity shall [develop]:(1) Develop procedures for assessing and responding to reports received from the program.(2) The following shall apply:(i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), 20250SB0930PN1047 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide, in a form and manner determined by the office, for a final disposition of each report received by the school entity within 30 days of receipt of a report from the program.(ii) For a life safety event, provide for a final disposition within 48 hours of the receipt of a report from the program.(e) Noncompliance.--The following shall apply to a school entity that fails to submit final dispositions to the office:(1) The office shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of each school entity that has not submitted final dispositions to the office.(2) The office shall report to the School Safety and Security Committee the school entities that have not submitted final dispositions to the office.(3) The School Safety and Security Committee may not award any grant administered by the committee to a school entity that has not submitted final dispositions to the office until the school entity has submitted final dispositions to the office.Section 12. Section 1307-D(b) of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1307-D. Annual report.* * *(b) Contents of report.--The report shall, at a minimum, include:* * *(7.1) The total number of trainings received by school entities from the office or a partner of the office.(7.2) The total number of trainings of school personnel 20250SB0930PN1047 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the program, including training on how to receive, respond and dispose of reports from the program.(7.3) A list of school entities that have not yet completed training on how to receive, respond and dispose of reports from the program.* * *Section 13. The definitions of "chief school administrator" and "Safe2Say Program" in section 1301-E of the act are amended to read:Section 1301-E. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Chief school administrator." A superintendent of a school district, executive director of an intermediate unit, administrative director of an area career and technical school or chief [executive officer] administrator of a charter school, regional charter school or cyber charter school.* * *"Safe2Say Something Program." The Safe2Say Something Program established under Article XIII-D.* * *Section 14. Section 1302-E(b)(1)(ii)(B)(IV) and (iv) of the act are amended and subsection (b)(1)(ii)(B) is amended by adding a subclause to read:Section 1302-E. Threat assessment teams.* * *(b) Team requirements.--The following shall apply to teams established under subsection (a):20250SB0930PN1047 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Each team shall:* * *(ii) Include:* * *(B) Other school staff or community resources who may serve as regular team members or be consulted during the threat assessment process, as appropriate, and as determined necessary by the team, including:* * *(IV) The individual identified by the school entity to receive reports from the Safe2Say Something Program.* * *(VII) An individual who serves on a local or county threat assessment team, if applicable.(iv) Be responsible, at a minimum, for the following:(A) Making age-appropriate informational materials available to students regarding recognition of threatening or at-risk behavior that may present a threat to the student, other students, school employees, school facilities, the community or others and how to report their concerns, including through the Safe2Say Something Program.(B) Making informational materials available to school employees regarding recognition of threatening or at-risk behavior that may present a threat to the student, other students, school employees, school facilities, the community or others and how to report their concerns, including through the Safe2Say 20250SB0930PN1047 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Something Program.(C) Ensuring that school employees are aware of the staff members who are appointed to the team and how to report threatening or at-risk behavior, including through the Safe2Say [program] Something Program.(D) Assisting in assessing and responding to reports received through the Safe2Say Something Program. Where a school entity has only one team, that team may also serve as the school entity's team for assessing and responding to reports received through the Safe2Say Something Program.(E) Assessing and responding to reports of students exhibiting self-harm or suicide risk factors or warning signs as provided for under section 1526.(F) Assessing, responding and making appropriate determinations and referrals under subsection (c) based on the information available to the team. The team, when appropriate, may coordinate with the student assistance program.(G) Providing required information to the chief school administrator or designee to make the report provided for under subsection (a)(2)(v).(H) Establishing protocols for timely consultation between the team and law enforcement, juvenile justice agencies, county agencies, health care providers or behavioral service providers, as appropriate, to refer students whose behavior indicates a potential threat for additional interventions or supports, including the exchange of 20250SB0930PN1047 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relevant information in accordance with Federal and State law.* * *Section 15. Section 1303-E(a)(3)(ii) of the act is amended to read:Section 1303-E. Threat assessment guidelines, training and information materials.(a) Duties of committee.--No later than 180 days from the effective date of this section, the committee shall:* * *(3) Develop model procedures and guidelines that school entities may use in implementing this article. The model procedures and guidelines shall, at a minimum:* * *(ii) Reflect best practices in identifying, reporting, assessing and responding to threats, including threats reported through the Safe2Say Something Program, and coordinating with stakeholders.* * *Section 16. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0930PN1047 - 16 - 1234567891011121314151617181920